Utah statutes.
72-3-206.   State park access highways -- Steinaker State Park to Yuba State Park.

State park access highways include:

(1)  STEINAKER STATE PARK.  Access to the Steinaker State Park begins in Uintah County at State Highway 191 and proceeds northwesterly on State Highway 301 a distance of 1.7 miles to the boat ramp at the park and is under the jurisdiction of UDOT.

(2)  TERRITORIAL STATEHOUSE STATE PARK.  Access to the Territorial Statehouse State Park is at the parking area in Millard County at milepoint 1.0 on State Highway 100.  No access road is defined.

(3)  UTAH FIELD HOUSE OF NATURAL HISTORY STATE PARK.  Access to Utah Field House of Natural History State Park is at the parking area in Uintah County at milepoint 145.8 on State Highway 40 at 496 East Main in Vernal.  No access road is defined.

(4)  UTAH LAKE STATE PARK.  Access to the Utah Lake State Park begins in Utah County at State Highway 114 and proceeds westerly on a county road a distance of 2.5 miles to the pay gate at the park and is under the jurisdiction of Utah County.

(5)  WASATCH MOUNTAIN STATE PARK (East Access).  The East Access to the Wasatch Mountain State Park begins at the Summit-Wasatch County line and proceeds westerly on Guardsman Pass Road, a county road, a distance of .9 miles; then southeasterly on Pine Canyon Road, a county road, a distance of 7.3 miles to the campground entrance.  The East Access is under the jurisdiction of Wasatch County.

(6)  WASATCH MOUNTAIN STATE PARK (South Access).  The South Access to the Wasatch Mountain State Park begins in Wasatch County at State Route 40 and proceeds westerly on Federal Route 3130 via River Road, Burgi Lane, and Cari Lane, county and city roads, a distance of 4.3 miles to State Highway 222; then northerly on State Highway 222, a distance of 1.1 miles to the campground entrance.  The South Access is under the jurisdiction of Wasatch County and Midway City.

(7)  WASATCH MOUNTAIN STATE PARK (West Access).  The West Access to the Wasatch Mountain State Park begins at the Salt Lake-Wasatch County line and proceeds easterly on Guardsman Pass Road, a county road, a distance of 1.7 miles; then southeasterly on Pine Canyon Road, a county road, a distance of 7.3 miles to the campground entrance.  The West Access is under the jurisdiction of Wasatch County.

(8)  WASATCH MOUNTAIN (Soldier Hollow).  Access to Soldier Hollow begins in Wasatch County at State Highway 113 and proceeds westerly on Tate Lane, a county road; then southwesterly on Soldier Hollow Lane to the parking area and clubhouse.

(9)  WASATCH MOUNTAIN (Cascade Springs).  Access to Cascade Springs begins in Wasatch County at the junction of Tate Lane and Stringtown Road, county roads, and proceeds northerly on Stringtown Road; then southwesterly on Cascade Springs Drive to the parking area.  The access is under the jurisdiction of Wasatch County.

(10)  WILLARD BAY STATE PARK (South).  Access to the Willard Bay State Park South begins in Box Elder County at a county road and proceeds northwesterly on State Highway 312 a distance of 0.2 miles to the marina parking at the park and is under the jurisdiction of UDOT.

(11)  WILLARD BAY STATE PARK (North).  Access to the Willard Bay State Park North begins in Box Elder County at Interstate Highway 15 and proceeds southwesterly on State Highway 315 a distance of 0.6 miles to the marina parking at the park and is under the jurisdiction of UDOT.

(12)  YUBA STATE PARK.  Access to the Yuba State Park begins in Juab County at Interstate Highway 15 and proceeds southerly on county road (L203) a distance of 4.1 miles to the pay gate at the park and is under the jurisdiction of Juab County.



Amended by Chapter 237, 2011 General Session

